en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Cosmetics > Bath & Body: Bar Soap; Bath Additives; Bath Bombs; Bath Brushes; Bath Sponges & Loofahs; Body Scrubs & Exfoliants; Body Wash; Hand Sanitizers & Wipes; Hygienic Wipes; Liquid Hand Soap; Powdered Hand Soap; Shower Caps
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Козметика > Вана и тяло: Сапун; Добавки за баня; Бомби за вана; Четки за баня; Гъби за баня и луфи; Скрабове и ексфолианти за тяло; Душ гел; Дезинфектанти и кърпички за ръце; Хигиенни кърпички; Течен сапун за ръце; Прахообразен сапун за ръце; Шапки за баня
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 化妆品 > 沐浴/身体护理: 肥皂/香皂; 沐浴添加物; 沐浴球; 浴刷; 浴球/浴花; 身体磨砂膏; 沐浴露; 洗手液和湿纸巾; 卫生湿巾; 洗手液; 粉末洗手皂; 浴帽
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Косметика > Для ванны и душа: Кусковое мыло; Пены и соли для ванны; Бомбочки для ванн; Щетки для душа; Губки и мочалки; Скрабы и эксфолианты для тела; Гели для душа; Антибактериальные гели и салфетки для рук; Гигиенические салфетки; Жидкое мыло для рук; Порошковое мыло для рук; Шапочки для душа
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Kosmetikk > Bad og kropp: Såpestykker; Badetilsetninger; Badebomber; Badebørster; Badesvamper og loofaher; Kroppsskrubb og eksfolieringsmidler; Kroppsvask; Hånddesinfeksjonsmidler og -kluter; Hygienekluter; Flytende håndsåpe; Håndsåpe i pulverform; Dusjhetter
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Kozmetika > Kupanje i njega tijela: Kruti sapuni; Dodaci za kupanje; Kuglice za kupanje; Četke za kupanje; Spužve za kupanje i lufa spužve; Pillinzi i eksfolijanti za tijelo; Gelovi za tuširanje; Dezinficijensi za ruke i dezinfekcijske maramice; Higijenske maramice; Tekući sapun za ruke; Sapun za ruke u prahu; Kape za tuširanje
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Kosmetiikka > Kylpy ja vartalo: Palasaippua; Kylpytuotteet; Kylpykuulat; Kylpyharjat; Kylpysienet ja pesupuffit; Vartalonkuorinta; Suihkusaippua; Käsihuuhteet ja -pyyhkeet; Intiimipyyhkeet; Nestemäinen käsisaippua; Jauhemainen käsisaippua; Suihkuhatut
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Kozmetikumok > Fürdés és test: Szappan; Fürdőadalékok; Fürdőbombák; Fürdőkefék; Fürdőszivacsok és luffák; Testradírok és hámlasztók; Testmosó; Kézfertőtlenítők és törlőkendők; Higiénikus törlőkendők; Folyékony kézi szappan; Elektromos kézi szappan; Zuhanysapkák
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cosméticos > Baño y cuidado corporal: Pastilla de jabón; Sales de baño y baño de burbujas; Bombas de baño; Cepillos para el baño; Esponjas de baño y lufas exfoliantes; Exfoliantes corporales; Gel de ducha; Desinfectantes para manos; Toallitas higiénicas; Jabón líquido para manos; Jabón de manos en polvo; Gorros para ducha
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Kosmetika > Badeartikel: Seife; Schaumbäder & Badesalze; Badebomben; Badebürsten; Bade- & Naturschwämme; Körperpeelings & Exfoliantien; Waschlotion; Handdesinfektionsmittel; Feuchttücher; Flüssigseifen; Seife in Pulverform; Duschhauben
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Cosmetice > Baie și corp: Săpunuri solide; Soluții pentru baie; Bile efervescentă pentru baie; Perii pentru baie; Bureți de baie și lufa; Exfoliante și gomaje pentru corp; Geluri de duș; Dezinfectant pentru mâini și șervețele; Șervețele igienice; Săpun lichid pentru mâini; Săpun pudră pentru mâini; Capișoane de duș
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Kosmetika > Bad och kropp: Tvål; Badtillsatser; Badbomb; Badborstar; Tvättsvampar och tvättgurkor; Kroppsskrubb och exfolieringsmedel; Duschkräm; Handsprit; Hygieniska våtservetter; Flytande tvål; Handtvål i pulverform; Duschmössor
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > コスメ・スキンケア > バス・ボディケア用品: 石鹸; 入浴剤; バスボム; ボディブラシ; ボディスポンジ・ヘチマ; ボディスクラブと角質除去剤; ボディソープ; 手指消毒剤; 除菌ワイプ; 液体ハンドソープ; 粉末ハンドソープ; シャワーキャップ
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 화장품 > 보디 제품: 비누; 입욕제; 배쓰밤; 목욕용 브러시; 목욕용 스펀지/타월; 바디 스크럽 및 각질 제거제; 보디워시; 손 세정제/세정티슈; 위생용 물티슈; 액상 손 세정제; 가루형 손세정제; 샤워캡
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Kosmetyki > Akcesoria i kosmetyki do kąpieli: Mydła w kostce; Dodatki do kąpieli; Kule do kąpieli; Szczotki do kąpieli; Gąbki i myjki do ciała; Peelingi do ciała; Żele pod prysznic; Mydła dezynfekujące do rąk; Chusteczki do higieny; Mydła w płynie do rąk; Mydła w proszku do rąk; Czepki pod prysznic
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cosmetici > Bagno e corpo: Saponetta; Bagnoschiuma e sali da bagno; Bombe da bagno; Spazzole da bagno; Spugne esfolianti; Scrub e esfolianti per il corpo; Bagni schiuma; Igienizzanti per mani; Salviettine igieniche per adulti; Sapone liquido per mani; Sapone in polvere; Cuffie da doccia
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Kozmetik > Banyo ve Vücut: Kalıp Sabun; Banyo Katkı Maddeleri; Banyo Bombaları; Banyo Fırçaları; Banyo Sünger ve Lifleri; Vücut Peelingleri ve Eksfolyanlar; Vücut Şampuanları; El Antiseptikleri; Hijyenik Mendil; Sıvı El Sabunu; Pudralı El Sabunu; Duş Boneleri
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Cosmétiques > Bain et corps: Savon solide; Sels de bain et produits moussants; Bombes de bain; Brosses de bain; Éponges de bain et luffas; Gommages et exfoliants corporels; Nettoyants pour le corps; Gels et lingettes hydroalcooliques; Lingettes hygiéniques; Savon liquide pour les mains; Savon en poudre pour les mains; Bonnets de douche
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Mỹ phẩm > Tắm và dưỡng thể: Xà phòng bánh; Sản phẩm làm sạch và chăm sóc da toàn thân; Viên bom tắm; Bàn chải tắm; Bông tắm xơ mướp; Tẩy tế bào chết cơ thể; Xà phòng tắm; Sản phẩm khử trùng tay và khăn lau; Khăn lau ướt; Nước rửa tay; Bột xà phòng rửa tay; Mũ tắm
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Καλλυντικά > Μπάνιο & σώμα: Σαπούνι σε μπάρα; Πρόσθετα μπάνιου; Μπάλες μπάνιου; Βούρτσες μπάνιου; Σφουγγάρια μπάνιου & λούφες; Scrubs και απολεπιστικά σώματος; Προϊόντα για πλύσιμο του σώματος; Απολυμαντικά & μαντηλάκια χεριών; Μαντηλάκια υγιεινής; Υγρό σαπούνι χεριών; Σαπούνι χεριών σε σκόνη; Σκουφάκια για το ντους
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Cosmetica > Bad en lichaam: Stuk zeep; Bubbelbad en badzout; Badbruisballen; Badborstels; Sponzen en douchescrubs; Lichaam scrubs en exfolianten; Bodywash; Handreinigers; Vochtige reinigers; Vloeibare handzeep; Handzeep in poedervorm; Douchemutsen
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Kosmetik > Bad og krop: Stangsæbe; Badesæber, -olier og -salt; Badebomber; Badebørster; Badesvampe og frottesvampe; Bodyscrubs og eksfolieringsmidler; Kropsshampoo; Håndrens; Vådservietter; Flydende håndsæbe; Håndsæbe i pulverform; Badehætter
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cosmética > Banho e corpo: Sabão em barra; Aditivos para o banho; Bombas de banho; Escovas para o banho; Esponjas e lufas para o banho; Esfoliantes e exfoliantes corporais; Lavagem de corpo; Antisséticos e toalhitas de mãos; Toalhitas higiénicas; Sabão líquido para as mãos; Sabão em pó para as mãos; Toucas de duche
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Kozmetika > Kopel in telo: Trdo milo; Dodatki za kopel; Kopalne krogle; Krtače za kopanje; Spužve in gobe za kopanje; Pilingi in eksfolianti za telo; Sredstvo za umivanje telesa; Sredstva za razkuževanje rok in robčki; Higienski robčki; Tekoče milo za roke; Milo za roke v prahu; Kape za tuširanje
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Kozmetika > Kúpeľ: Mydlo; Prísady do kúpeľa; Šumivé bomby do kúpeľa; Kefy do kúpeľa; Špongie a hubky do kúpeľa; Telové peelingy a exfolianty; Telové šampóny; Prípravky a obrúsky na dezinfekciu rúk; Hygienické obrúsky; Tekuté mydlo na ruky; Práškové mydlo na ruky; Sprchové čiapky
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Kosmetika > Vonia ir kūnas: Gabalinis muilas; Vonios priedai; Vonios bombos; Vonios šepečiai; Vonios kempinės ir lufos; Kūno šveitikliai ir eksfoliantai; Kūno prausikliai; Rankų dezinfekavimo priemonės ir servetėlės; Higieninės servetėlės; Skystas rankų muilas; Rankų muilo milteliai; Dušo kepuraitės
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cosméticos > Banho e corpo: Sabonete; Sais de banho e banho de espuma; Bolas de banho; Escovas de banho; Esponjas e escovas de banho; Esfoliantes corporais; Sabonetes para o corpo; Desinfetante de mãos; Lenços umedecidos higiênicos; Sabonete líquido para as mãos; Sabonete em pó para as mãos; Toucas de banho
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 化妝品 > 身體清潔用品: 香皂; 沐浴添加劑; 沐浴球; 沐浴刷; 沐浴用海綿/絲瓜綿; 身體磨砂及去角質; 沐浴劑; 乾洗手/濕紙巾; 衛生濕紙巾; 洗手乳; 洗手皂粉; 浴帽
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > เครื่องสำอาง > เรือนร่างและการอาบน้ำ: สบู่ก้อน; สารเพิ่มคุณภาพครีมอาบน้ำ; ลูกบอลสำหรับอาบน้ำ; แปรงอาบน้ำ; ฟองน้ำอาบน้ำและขัดผิว; สครับและผลิตภัณฑ์ขัดผิวกาย; สบู่อาบน้ำ; ทิชชู่เปียกและเจลล้างมือ; ทิชชู่เปียก; สบู่เหลวล้างมือ; สบู่ล้างมือแบบเป็นผง; หมวกอาบน้ำ
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Kosmetika > Koupele a péče o tělo: Kusové mýdlo; Koupelové oleje a soli; Bomby do koupele; Koupelové kartáče; Mycí houby a žínky; Tělové peelingy a exfolianty; Sprchové gely; Mýdlo na ruce; Hygienické ubrousky; Tekuté mýdlo; Prášková mýdla na ruce; Sprchovací čepice